Tennessee, session 114, SB0330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-1-114, is amended by removing
the comma after "the general assembly" and inserting "and legislative librarian," immediately
following "the general assembly".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0330
002236
- 1 -